Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6307
Annual report; contents; failure to file; effect; final report; when required.

(1) Each qualified small business, qualified investor, and qualified fund shall submit an annual report to the director by July 1 of each year. The report shall certify that the business, investor, or fund satisfies the requirements of the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act.

(2) A qualified small business that ceases all operations and becomes insolvent shall file a final report with the director in the form required by the director documenting its insolvency.

(3) To maintain the confidentiality of the qualified investor, the Department of Economic Development shall use a designated number to identify such persons or entities.

(4) A qualified small business, qualified investor, or qualified fund that fails to file a complete annual report by July 1 shall, at the discretion of the director, be subject to a fine of two hundred dollars, revocation of its certification, or both.

Laws 2011, LB389, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB1067, § 9;

Laws 2015, LB156, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB217, § 30;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 11.
July 18, 2026